Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-2013
Incarcerated county officer; forfeiture of office; replacement.

Except as provided in section 23-2001, the county board may require a county officer incarcerated for the conviction of a crime to temporarily forfeit his or her powers and duties while so incarcerated. The county board may declare the office temporarily vacant and appoint a replacement for the period of time such officer is incarcerated. The temporary officer shall assume all the powers and duties of the office and be compensated accordingly. No compensation shall be given to the incarcerated officer. If no other action is taken, the county officer may resume all duties of his or her office after the completion of his or her period of incarceration.

Laws 1985, LB 423, § 1.

The Legislature's provisions of denying compensation when an official is incarcerated do not show an intent to provide compensation in all other instances. Hogan v. Garden County, 268 Neb. 631, 686 N.W.2d 356 (2004).

This section is silent about compensation. Hogan v. Garden County, 268 Neb. 631, 686 N.W.2d 356 (2004).